District of Columbia statutes.
29-1124

Dissolution.

(a)

An unincorporated nonprofit association may be dissolved as follows:

(1)

If the governing principles provide a time or method for dissolution, at that time or by that method;

(2)

If the governing principles do not provide a time or method for dissolution, upon approval by the members;

(3)

If no member can be located and the association’s operations have been discontinued for at least 3 years, by the managers or, if the association has no current manager, by its last manager;

(4)

By court order; or

(5)

Under law other than this chapter.

(b)

After dissolution, an unincorporated nonprofit association continues in existence until its activities have been wound up and it is terminated pursuant to § 29-1125.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
This section is referenced in § 29-1112.
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 28 of the Uniform Unincorporated Nonprofit Association Act (2008 Act).